Louisiana, session 2026, HB764.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The legislature finds that a significant statistical disparity exists between
the availability of minority-owned and disadvantaged business enterprises in Louisiana and
their utilization in state contracts. The current passive equal opportunity posture of state
procurement has failed to correct this disparity, which persists as a direct result of historical
and ongoing discrimination in contracting, bonding, financing, and access to information.
The state has a compelling interest in remedying discrimination in its own contracting
marketplace and in ensuring that public dollars benefit the full diversity of Louisiana's
citizenry. It is the intent of the legislature to establish aspirational but enforceable
participation goals for minority-owned and disadvantaged business enterprises in state
contracting; require the state to conduct a disparity study every five years to update goals
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1281 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 764
based on current market data; create accountability mechanisms and annual reporting
requirements; and provide technical assistance to assist minority-owned and disadvantaged
business enterprises in qualifying for and performing on state contracts.
Section 2. Chapter 27 of Subtitle III of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 39:2211 through 2217, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 27. LOUISIANA STATE CONTRACT MINORITY BUSINESS
OPPORTUNITY ACT
§2211. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Certified MBE/DBE" means a business enterprise that holds a current
certification as a minority business enterprise (MBE) or disadvantaged business
enterprise (DBE) from any of the following:
(a) The Department of Transportation and Development.
(b) The United States Small Business Administration 8(a) or HUBZone
program.
(c) A certification program approved by the division of administration.
(2) "Contract" means any agreement for the procurement of goods, services,
construction, professional services, or information technology by any state agency,
department, board, commission, or authority, regardless of the source of funding.
(3) "Division" means the division of administration.
(4) "MBE/DBE participation goal" means the percentage of the total dollar
value of a contract or of total state procurement in a fiscal year that is targeted for
performance by certified MBE/DBEs.
(5) "Prime contractor" means the entity holding the primary contractual
relationship with the state.
(6) "Subcontractor" means any entity performing a portion of a contract
under agreement with the prime contractor.
§2212. Statewide MBE/DBE participation goals
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1281 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 764
A. The legislature hereby establishes the following certified MBE/DBE
participation goals:
(1) Overall statewide goals: A minimum of thirty percent of the total annual
dollar value of state contracts shall be awarded to or performed by certified
MBE/DBEs by Fiscal Year 2031-2032.
(2) Construction contracts: A minimum of twenty-five percent of the dollar
value of each construction contract with a total value exceeding fifty thousand
dollars.
(3) Professional services contracts: A minimum of thirty percent of the dollar
value of each professional services contract with a total value exceeding twenty-five
thousand dollars.
(4) Goods and supplies procurement: A minimum of twenty percent of the
total annual procurement spend on goods and supplies.
B. Interim goals shall be established as follows:
(1) For Fiscal Year 2028-2029: Fifteen percent.
(2) For Fiscal Year 2029-2030: Twenty percent.
(3) For Fiscal Year 2030-2031: Twenty-five percent.
(4) For Fiscal Year 2031-2032 and every fiscal year thereafter: Thirty
percent.
C. Goals shall be applied both to direct awards to certified MBE/DBE prime
contractors and to subcontractor participation on contracts awarded to prime
contractors that are not certified MBE/DBEs.
§2213. Agency obligations and compliance requirements
A. Each state agency shall do all of the following:
(1) Designate an MBE/DBE compliance officer responsible for implementing
this Chapter.
(2) Maintain a database of certified MBE/DBEs in its procurement sector.
(3) Conduct outreach to certified MBE/DBEs no less than sixty days prior to
soliciting bids for contracts anticipated to exceed fifty thousand dollars.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1281 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 764
(4) Require prime contractors to submit certified MBE/DBE utilization plans
as part of their bid or proposal submissions.
(5) Include certified MBE/DBE utilization as a weighted evaluation criterion
in scored procurements.
(6) Report quarterly to the division on certified MBE/DBE participation rates.
B. Prime contractors shall be subject to all of the following requirements:
(1) Make good faith efforts to meet applicable certified MBE/DBE
participation goals.
(2) Negotiate in good faith with certified MBE/DBEs when quotes from these
entities are received.
(3) Not terminate a certified MBE/DBE subcontractor without prior written
approval from the contracting agency.
(4) Submit monthly utilization reports to the contracting agency detailing
payments made to certified MBE/DBE subcontractors.
§2214. Sanctions for noncompliance
A. An agency that fails to meet applicable participation goals for two
consecutive fiscal years, absent a documented showing of good faith effort and
market availability, shall be subject to all of the following requirements and
conditions:
(1) A written corrective action plan to be submitted to the division within
sixty days.
(2) Mandatory certified MBE/DBE compliance training for all procurement
personnel.
(3) Enhanced division oversight of procurement activities.
B. A prime contractor that fails to meet its committed certified MBE/DBE
utilization plan without documented good faith efforts and state approval shall be
subject to all of the following requirements and conditions:
(1) Withholding of final contract payment in an amount equal to the certified
MBE/DBE participation shortfall.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1281 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 764
(2) Disqualification from state contracting for a period of one to three years,
in the discretion of the division.
(3) Referral to the attorney general for civil enforcement action.
§2215. Disparity study; goal adjustment
A. The division shall commission an independent disparity study no later than
July 1, 2027, and every five years thereafter to examine all of the following:
(1) The availability and utilization of certified MBE/DBEs in each major
procurement category.
(2) Barriers to certified MBE/DBE participation including bonding,
financing, and information access.
(3) Statistical disparity indices for each certified group and procurement
category.
(4) Comparisons with peer states and best practices.
B. Following each disparity study, the division shall recommend to the
legislature revised participation goals based on the study findings.
§2216. Annual reporting
The division shall publish an annual certified MBE/DBE participation report
by January first of each year, to be submitted to the legislature and publicly posted
on its website, detailing each state agency's contract awards by dollar value, the
percentage and dollar amount awarded to or performed by certified MBE/DBEs,
corrective actions taken, and progress toward statewide goals.
§2217. Promulgation of rules
The commissioner of administration shall promulgate in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act all such rules as are necessary for implementation and
administration of the provisions of this Chapter.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1281 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 764